Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-35] Retention of jurisdiction.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the court may retain jurisdiction
under this chapter until the full term for which any order entered expires or
until the child attains nineteen years of age, whichever comes first. [L 2010,
c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next